Alaska statutes. Title 44. State Government.
Article 3. Film Office.

Cross references. —

For provisions relating to an additional one-time incentive credit for the first scripted episodic television production produced in the state after July 1, 2013, see § 35, ch. 51, SLA 2012 in the 2012 Temporary and Special Acts.

For nonseverability of the sections of this article from one another and from other 2012 amendments in ch. 51, SLA 2012 relating to film tax credits, in case one of those sections or provisions is held invalid, see § 38, ch. 51, SLA 2012 in the 2012 Temporary and Special Acts.
Sections affected by the 2012 film tax credit amendments include AS

24.20.271

, AS

43.75.130(f)

, AS

43.77.060(e)

, AS

43.98.030

, AS

44.25.100

- 44.25.190, AS

44.33.231

, and AS

44.33.232

-

44.33.239

.

For transitional provision relating to the delayed repeal of AS

44.25.100

— 44.25.190, the 2012 amendments to AS

43.98.030

, and the 2013 repeal of AS

44.33.231

—

44.33.239

, see sec. 4, ch. 21, SLA 2013.

Secs. 44.25.100 — 44.25.130.
Film office; duties; Alaska film production incentive program; eligibility; qualification for film production tax credit; award of film production tax credit; determination of qualified expenditures. [Repealed, § 7 ch 35 SLA 2015, effective July 1, 2015.]

Sec. 44.25.135.
Recovery of film production tax credit.

History.

[Repealed, § 8 ch 35 SLA 2015 ch 35 SLA 2015.]

Secs. 44.25.140 — 44.25.190.
Regulations, Alaska Film Incentive Review Commission; review of qualifications and award of film production tax credits; definitions. [Repealed, § 7 ch 35 SLA 2015.]